Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1207
Bargaining collectively; sections not applicable.

Nothing in sections 48-1201 to 48-1209 shall be deemed to interfere with, impede or in any way diminish the right of employees to bargain collectively with their employers through representatives of their own choosing in order to establish wages or other conditions of work in excess of the applicable minimum under the provisions of sections 48-1201 to 48-1209.

Laws 1967, c. 285, § 7, p. 776.